District of Columbia statutes.
34-1731.07

Franchisee selection procedures.

Notwithstanding provisions of Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2, to the contrary, except the protest and dispute provisions over which the Contract Appeals Board shall maintain jurisdiction, the Mayor shall implement the following franchise selection procedure in awarding one or more franchises pursuant to this chapter:

(1)

Request for information;

(2)

Evaluation of the RFI received and preparation of the RFP;

(3)

Issuance of the RFP and evaluation of proposals received;

(4)

Submission of an executive summary, including findings and determination that selection of one or more franchisees will provide the greatest benefit to the largest population of digitally-disadvantaged residents of the District of Columbia, including a rationale for limiting the franchise award to one entity or extending franchises to more than one entity, to the Council by the Mayor;

(5)

Council review and approval of the proposed franchise agreement; and

(6)

Execution of franchise agreement.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-210, § 8, 53 DCR 9122
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 8 of Digital Inclusion Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-467, July 25, 2006, 53 DCR 6754).